Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 2
SPECIFIC VETERANS COMMUNITY
LIVING CENTERS AUTHORIZED

26-12-201. Veterans community living centers authorized.

Repealed.

Subject to available appropriations, there is authorized the establishment and construction of veterans centers for veterans of service in the armed forces of the United States and their spouses, surviving spouses, or dependent parents. Each veterans center is known as a Colorado veterans community living center, collectively referred to in this article 12 as "veterans centers". The veterans centers are type 2 entities, as defined by section 24-1-105.

Veterans centers must be located at or near the city of Florence, at or near the city of Walsenburg, at or near the city of Rifle, at or near the city of Aurora, and in Homelake.

The state department shall evaluate any proposed sites for a new veterans center to be constructed, leased, or purchased on or after July 1, 1998, in accordance with section 26-12-111.

The veterans centers shall be designed and constructed so as to qualify for federal funding under the provisions of federal Public Law 88-450, as amended. The veterans centers shall be under the control and supervision of the state department, and they shall be operated so as to qualify for per diem payments from the United States veterans administration under the provisions of 38 U.S.C. sec. 1741.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 190, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 99:

(4) amended, p. 627, § 33, effective August 4.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-056), ch. 177, p. 785, § 7, effective April 22.

L. 2011:

(1) repealed, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1171, § 77, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 270, § 21, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 16-1397), ch. 202, p. 716, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3378, § 73, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 26-12-201 and 26-12-401 as they existed prior to 1998.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-12-201.5. Veterans state community living center at former Fitzsimons - legislative intent - continuum of residential care services and care for veterans and veterans' families - definitions.

Subject to available appropriations, this section authorizes and establishes a state veterans community living center on the site of the former Fitzsimons Army medical center. It is the intent of the general assembly that the property on the site of the former Fitzsimons Army medical center is for the exclusive use of veterans and qualifying family members of veterans. It is the further intent of the general assembly that any construction on the property on the site of the former Fitzsimons Army medical center after January 1, 2016, must be completed consistent with the original intent in the language of the 1999 memorandum of agreement between the Fitzsimons redevelopment authority, the city of Aurora, and the state department.

The completion of the Fitzsimons project pursuant to this section, after January 1, 2016, is not subject to the average occupancy requirements of section 26-12-111 (4) for new construction.

The state department shall work to expeditiously develop the vacant parcels of land to the north and south of the Fitzsimons veterans community living center existing as of January 1, 2016. The vacant parcels of land must be used to construct and operate facilities that will provide a continuum of residential care options exclusively for veterans or qualifying family members of veterans. The continuum of residential care options may include, but need not be limited to, domiciliary and assisted living, transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, and any such other residential and supportive services as are needed or beneficial.

The state department shall seek input, as appropriate, from the board of commissioners of veterans community living centers created pursuant to section 26-12-402, the state board of veterans affairs, and a statewide coalition of veterans organizations.

The state department shall ensure, through contractual or other means, that the property continues in perpetuity to be operated exclusively for veterans and qualifying family members of veterans.

The state department shall include progress updates on the Fitzsimons project in its annual report and shall provide quarterly progress updates to the members of the state, veterans, and military affairs committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, on or before September 30, 2016; December 31, 2016; March 31, 2017; and June 30, 2017.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Qualifying family member of a veteran" means a family member of a veteran who qualifies for services pursuant to the requirements established by the federal veterans administration.

"Veteran" means a person who served in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, in accordance with U.S.C. title 38, as amended.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1163, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(1), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 1552, § 30, effective August 2.

L. 2005:

(6) amended, p. 35, § 1, effective March 18; (7) added, p. 599, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(7)(b)(IV) added, p. 188, § 25, effective March 22.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 270, § 22, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 16-1397), ch. 202, p. 714, § 1, effective June 1.

26-12-202. Walsenburg veterans community living center - contractual arrangement.

For as long as the contract is in effect with the Huerfano county hospital district for the operation of the Walsenburg veterans community living center, the contract shall state that the veterans center is a separate entity for financial reporting purposes. The contract shall also state that the district is responsible for financial reporting, rate calculation, financial performance, compliance with all state and federal regulations, and compliance with section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The Walsenburg veterans community living center must remain a state-owned entity for purposes of qualifying for federal veterans assistance payments and other federal veterans programs.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting the state's ability to take over operations or to contract with any other entity should the contract with the district terminate.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 191, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 271, § 23, effective August 6.

26-12-203. The Colorado veterans community living center at Homelake - jurisdiction - definitions.

The Colorado veterans community living center at Homelake, consisting of a veterans center, a domiciliary care unit, and the Homelake military veterans cemetery, referred to in this part 2 as the "veterans center", is declared to be a veterans center for veterans of service in the armed forces of the United States and their spouses, surviving spouses, and dependent parents. The Colorado veterans community living center at Homelake is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The legal effect of any statute enacted prior to July 1, 1973, designating such institution as the soldiers' and sailors' home or the Monte Vista golden age center, or by any other name, or property rights acquired and obligations incurred prior to said date under any other name, shall not be impaired hereby.

The veterans center shall be under the control and supervision of the state department.

For purposes of this section, "domiciliary care" means the provision of shelter, food, and necessary medical care on an ambulatory self-care basis:

To assist any individual who is eligible for occupancy in the veterans center pursuant to sections 26-12-104 and 26-12-106 and who is suffering from an incapacitating disability, disease, or disorder that prevents him or her from earning a living, but that does not require hospitalization or nursing care services to attain physical, mental, and social well-being; and

To restore, through special rehabilitative programs, such individual to his or her highest level of functioning.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 191, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) and (3)(a) amended, (HB 12-1063), ch.149, p. 536, § 3, effective May 3.

L. 2014:

(1)(a), (2), and (3)(a) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 271, § 24, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1334, § 223, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3378, § 74, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-301 as it existed prior to 1998.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", see article 1 of title 24.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

(3) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-12-204. Sale of property.

The executive director, with the approval of the state board, shall sell any real property at the veterans center declared to be surplus by the state board to the highest bidder on such terms and conditions as are deemed appropriate by the executive director for not less than the appraised value thereof, as determined by an appraiser who is a member of the members appraisal institute (MAI), and to execute deeds of conveyance of such real property.

Upon the sale of real property pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the proceeds shall be deposited in the central fund and applied toward the retirement of any outstanding anticipation warrants.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 192, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1063), ch. 149, p. 537, § 4, effective May 3.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 271, § 25, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-312 (2.5) as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-205. Homelake military veterans cemetery - definitions - fund - rules.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Cemetery" means the Homelake military veterans cemetery established and maintained at the veterans center pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, including:

The two triangular areas that are adjacent to, and to the northeast and northwest of, the circular cemetery proper; and

The triangular area of land to the direct north of the existing cemetery as of May 3, 2012.

"Fund" means the Homelake military veterans cemetery fund created pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

The general assembly hereby authorizes the establishment and maintenance of the cemetery at the veterans center. The state department shall maintain the cemetery.

The state department may enter into contracts or agreements with any person or public or private entity to prepare, develop, construct, operate, and maintain the cemetery.

Any veteran who served honorably in any branch of the armed forces of the United States and who, at the time of his or her death, was a resident of this state shall be eligible for burial and interment at the cemetery.

Burial and interment may be provided at the cemetery for any spouse, surviving spouse, or dependent parent of an honorably discharged veteran or discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in section 28-5-100.3, of any branch of the armed forces of the United States.

All necessary expenses incident to the burial and interment at the cemetery of any person who may be buried and interred at the cemetery pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be paid from the estate of the decedent.

The state department shall adopt procedures whereby persons who are eligible for burial and interment in the cemetery, in exchange for monetary consideration in an amount to be determined by the state department but not to exceed the amount of the burial and memorial benefit provided to an eligible veteran by the federal department of veterans affairs, may reserve plots there for the burial and interment of themselves and their spouses. In adopting such procedures, the state department shall ensure that a person who possesses such a reservation on May 3, 2012, shall retain his or her reservation.

There is hereby established in the state treasury the Homelake military veterans cemetery fund. The fund shall consist of moneys transferred to the fund pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), any revenue generated from activities associated with the cemetery and its operations, and any moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly. The moneys in the fund are subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department for the direct and indirect costs associated with capital improvements to, and the operation and maintenance of, the cemetery and for the implementation of this section. Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of the section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided in section 24-36-113, C.R.S. Any interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

The state department is authorized to accept gifts, grants, and donations for the purposes of this section; except that the state department shall not accept a gift, grant, or donation that is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with the provisions of this section or any other law of the state. The state department shall transfer all private and public moneys received through gifts, grants, and donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund.

To the extent permitted by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), a person who contributes a gift, grant, or donation to the fund may designate a specific purpose for which the gift, grant, or donation is to be used. The state department shall not unreasonably delay a project that is sufficiently funded by gifts, grants, or donations.

The state department shall not expend more than five percent of the moneys annually expended from the fund to pay for the administrative costs of implementing this section.

Repealed.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that any use of the cemetery property is for a public purpose expressly authorized by the general assembly and therefore permissible under any grant of right-of-way applicable to such property executed by the state board of land commissioners.

Subject to available appropriations, the state department may contract for professional services necessary for the implementation of this section.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the state department will implement the provisions of this section by assigning to the cemetery one-half of a full-time employee from within the existing personnel resources of the state department.

On or before January 1, 2014, the state department shall establish a phased plan for expansion of the cemetery. The state department shall identify phases in a manner that is aesthetically appropriate, cost-effective, and capable of incremental implementation as funding becomes available; except that the first phase shall consist of the portion of the project described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (8). The expansion project shall include work sufficient to meet the demand for unreserved burial plots in the cemetery and to allow the state department to conduct interments at the rate of fifteen interments per year. To the extent practicable, in implementing the expansion plan, the state department shall make use of work completed by third parties pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section and coordinate with such parties to ensure that work completed for the expansion project meets the standards and specifications of the phased plan.

On or before July 1, 2014, the state department shall complete the expansion of the cemetery and make available for eligible veterans of the United States armed forces and their spouses new cemetery plots in the two triangular areas that are adjacent to, and to the northeast and northwest of, the circular cemetery proper.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 192, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2012:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 12-1063), ch. 149, p. 534, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) and (4)(b) amended and (8) added, (SB 13-040), ch. 263, p. 1382, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2014:

(4)(d) repealed, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1270, § 32, effective May 31; IP(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 272, § 26, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

(3)(b) amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 176, § 9, effective November 11.

26-12-206. Statement of intent.

The general assembly of the state of Colorado hereby expresses its intent to appropriate the necessary funds from time to time to plan and construct the state nursing homes and to operate said homes in accordance with Title 38, U.S. Code.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 192, § 1, effective April 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-403 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-207. Federal funds.

Whenever a law or rule pertaining to the veterans administration or any other federal law permits the state to receive federal funds for the use and benefit of veterans community living centers, the executive director shall apply for and use such federal funds for the benefit of the veterans centers.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 192, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 272, § 27, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-405 as it existed prior to 1998.